South Dakota, session 2026, SB170.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 37-24:
Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person may not engage in a
commercial transaction or trade practice with a consumer if:
(1) The transaction or practice requires the consumer to communicate with or interact
with a chatbot, an artificial intelligence agent, an avatar, or another form of
computer technology that engages in a textual or aural conversation; and
(2) The consumer could reasonably believe that the consumer is engaging with
human.
The prohibition set forth in this section does not apply if the consumer is notified,
in a clear and conspicuous fashion, at the outset of the transaction or practice, that the
consumer is not communicating with another human.
Section 2. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 37-24:
Except as otherwise provided in this section, either a consumer subjected to a
commercial transaction or trade practice that does not comply with section 1 of this Act,
or the attorney general, may bring a civil action against the violating person, except as
provided below, and may recover:
(1) Actual damages;
(2) Liquidated damages in the amount of one thousand dollars for each violation; or
(3) In the case of a class action, an amount not exceeding ten million dollars.
The prevailing party may also recover reasonable attorney's fees and costs.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.254.11 2 170
Nothing in this section permits a cause of action against an internet service
provider who is involved only in the routine transmission of the violative transaction or
trade practice over the provider's computer network.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 37-24:
The attorney general may seek injunctive relief against any person that fails to
comply with section 1 of this Act.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.